New York, session 2025-2026, S3563.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs b and g of subdivision 1 of section 467-b of the 2 real property tax law, paragraph b as amended by chapter 188 of the laws 3 of 2005 and paragraph g as added by chapter 360 of the laws of 2018, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 b. "Head of the household" means a person (i) who is sixty-two years 6 of age or older, [or] (ii) who qualifies as a person with a disability 7 pursuant to subdivision five of this section, or (iii) who is the rela- 8 tive or legal guardian of a qualifying member of their household, and is 9 entitled to the possession or to the use or occupancy of a dwelling 10 unit; 11 g. "Qualifying member of the household" means a person who qualifies 12 as a person with a disability pursuant to subdivision five of this 13 section, who is not the head of the household, and who permanently 14 resides in the dwelling unit. 15 h. "Relative" means with respect to a qualifying member of the house- 16 hold, (i) a spouse, domestic partner, parent, grandparent, sibling, 17 child, stepchild or stepparent of such person or (ii) any individual who 18 is the direct descendant of the grandparents of such person. 19 i. "Supervising agency" shall mean the appropriate rent control agency 20 or administrative agency designated to administer the tax abatement for 21 rent-controlled and rent regulated property occupied by senior citizens 22 or persons with disabilities pursuant to a local law, resolution, or 23 ordinance passed pursuant to subdivision two of this section. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04330-01-5